Missouri, session 2026, SB1248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.566, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
442.566 and 442.568, to read as follows:
442.566. As used in sections 442.560 to 442.591,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Agricultural land", any tract of land in this
state consisting of more than five acres, whether inside or
outside the corporate limits of any municipality, which is
capable, without substantial modification to the character
of the land, of supporting an agricultural enterprise,
including but not limited to land used for the production of
agricultural crops or fruit or other horticultural products,
or for the raising or feeding of animals for the production
of livestock or livestock products, poultry or poultry
products, or milk or dairy products. Adjacent parcels of
land under the same ownership shall be deemed to be a single
tract;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1248 2
(2) "Alien", any person who is not a citizen of the
United States and who is not a resident of the United States
or of some state, territory, trusteeship, or protectorate of
the United States;
(3) "Company", a sole proprietorship, organization,
association, corporation, partnership, joint venture,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or
limited liability company, including a wholly-owned
subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or
affiliate of those entities or business associations, that
exists to make a profit;
(4) "Designated country", any of the following:
(a) A country identified by the United States Director
of National Intelligence as a country that poses a risk to
the national security of the United States in at least one
of the three most recent annual threat assessments of the
U.S. intelligence community issued pursuant to Section 108B,
federal National Security Act of 1947 (50 U.S.C. Section
3043b); or
(b) A country designated by the governor pursuant to
section 442.568;
(5) "Director", the director of the Missouri
department of agriculture;
(6) "Domiciled", having established a place as an
individual's true, fixed, and permanent home and principal
residence to which the individual intends to return whenever
absent;
[(4)] (7) "Family members" includes all persons within
the ninth degree of consanguinity, or the living or
surviving spouse of any person within the ninth degree of
consanguinity;

SB 1248 3
[(5)] (8) "Foreign business", any business entity
whether or not incorporated, including but not limited to
corporations, partnerships, limited partnerships, and
associations, in which a controlling interest is owned by
aliens. In determining ownership of a foreign business,
legal fictions such as corporate form or trust shall be
disregarded;
(9) "Organization", a business trust, real estate
investment trust, joint stock company, cooperative,
association, bank, insurance company, credit union, savings
and loan association, or other organization, regardless of
whether the organization is for-profit, nonprofit, domestic,
or foreign;
(10) "Real property", includes the following:
(a) Agricultural land;
(b) An improvement located on agricultural land;
(c) Commercial property;
(d) Industrial property;
(e) Groundwater;
(f) Residential property;
(g) A mine or quarry;
(h) A mineral in place;
(i) Standing timber; or
(j) Water rights;
[(6)] (11) "Residence", the place of general abode;
the place of general abode of a person means his principal,
actual dwelling place in fact, where he intends to remain
permanently or for an indefinite period of time at least;
(12) "Transnational criminal organization", two or
more persons:
(a) Who are citizens of or domiciled in a designated
country;

SB 1248 4
(b) With an identifiable leadership who operate
internationally; and
(c) Who continuously or regularly associate to engage
in corruption, violence, or the commission of other criminal
activities.
442.568. 1. The following may not purchase or
otherwise acquire an interest in real property in this state:
(1) A governmental entity of a designated country;
(2) A company or organization that is:
(a) Headquartered in a designated country;
(b) Directly or indirectly held or controlled by the
government of a designated country;
(c) Owned by or the majority of stock or other
ownership interest of which is held or controlled by
individuals described by subdivision (4) of this subsection;
or
(d) Designated by the governor under subsection 2 of
this section;
(3) A company or organization that is owned by or the
majority of stock or other ownership interest of which is
held or controlled by a company or organization described by
subdivision (2) of this subsection; or
(4) An individual who:
(a) Is domiciled in a designated country, except that
an individual who is lawfully present and residing in the
United States at the time the individual purchases or
acquires the interest may purchase or acquire an interest in
a residential property that is intended for use as an
individual's residence homestead;
(b) Is a citizen of a designated country who is
domiciled outside of the United States in a country:
a. Other than a designated country; and

SB 1248 5
b. For which the individual has not completed the
naturalization process for becoming a citizen of that
country;
(c) Is a citizen of a designated country who is
unlawfully present in the United States;
(d) Is:
a. A citizen of a country other than the United
States; and
b. Acting as an agent or on behalf of a designated
country; or
(e) Is a member of the ruling political party or any
subdivision of the ruling political party in a designated
country.
2. (1) The governor, after consultation with the
director of the department of public safety, may, for
purposes of subsection 1 of this section:
(a) Determine whether the purchase or acquisition of
an interest in real property in this state by an individual
company, organization, or other entity poses a risk to the
national security of the public; and
(b) Based on a determination made under paragraph (a)
of this subdivision:
a. Designate a country or a transnational criminal
organization or other entity as subject to this section; or
b. Remove a designation made pursuant to subparagraph
a of this paragraph.
(2) The designation or removal of the designation made
pursuant to this subsection applies only to the purchase or
acquisition of an interest in real property that occurs on
or after the date the governor designates or removes the
designation.

SB 1248 6
3. (1) The attorney general shall establish
procedures to examine a purchase or acquisition of an
interest in real property and determine whether an
investigation of a possible violation of this section is
warranted.
(2) If the attorney general determines that an
investigation of a purchase or acquisition of an interest in
real property is warranted under this section, the attorney
general shall investigate the purchase or acquisition of an
interest in real property and determine whether a violation
of this section occurred.
(3) If the attorney general determines that a
violation of this section occurred, the attorney general may:
(a) Bring an in rem action against real property to
enforce this section in a circuit court in the county where
all or part of the real property that is the subject of the
violation is located; and
(b) Refer the matter to the appropriate local, state,
or federal law enforcement agency.
(4) The attorney general shall record notice of an
action brought under subdivision (3) of this subsection in
the real property records of each county where any part of
the real property subject to the action is located.
(5) Except for an acquisition of a leasehold interest,
a purchase or acquisition of an interest in real property in
violation of this section is not void because of the
violation, and the validity or enforceability by any person
of a purchase contract for or the conveyance of an interest
in the real property is not otherwise affected by the
violation.
4. (1) If the circuit court finds that the real
property subject to an action brought pursuant to this

SB 1248 7
section was purchased or an interest in the real property
was otherwise acquired in violation of this section, the
court shall:
(a) Enter an order that:
a. States the court's finding;
b. Orders the divestment of the individual's or
entity's interest in the real property; and
c. Appoints a receiver to:
(i) Divest the individual's or entity's interest in
100 the real property through sale, termination of a leasehold,
101 or other disposition of the interest; and
102 (ii) Manage and control the real property pending the
103 sale or other disposition of the interest in the real
104 property; and
105 (b) Refer the matter to the appropriate prosecuting
106 attorney for criminal prosecution of any appropriate
107 criminal offense in connection with the transaction.
108 (2) On appointment and qualification, a receiver
109 appointed under this section has the powers and duties of a
110 receiver pursuant to chapter 515.
111 (3) Proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an
112 interest in real property under an order described by
113 subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be applied first to
114 satisfy any existing liens on the property and then to pay
115 the reasonable costs incurred by the state in enforcing this
116 section. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
117 individual or entity that purchased or otherwise acquired
118 the interest in violation of this section.
119 5. (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful
120 purchase of real property by an alien if the person:
121 (a) Is an individual described by subdivision (4) of
122 subsection 1 of this section; and

SB 1248 8
123 (b) Intentionally or knowingly purchases or otherwise
124 acquires an interest in real property in this state in
125 violation of this section.
126 (2) The offense of unlawful purchase of real property
127 by an alien is a class E felony.
128 6. (1) The attorney general may bring an action in
129 the name of the state against a company, organization, or
130 other entity that violates this section.
131 (2) A company, organization, or other entity that a
132 court determines in an action brought pursuant to this
133 section to have violated this section is liable to the state
134 for a civil penalty equal to the greater of:
135 (a) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars; or
136 (b) Fifty percent of the market value of the interest
137 in real property that is the subject of the violation.
✓